Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-380
Garbage disposal plant; system or solid waste disposal areas; cities and villages; agreement.

Any governing body of any incorporated city or village situated within the county may enter into agreement with the county as provided by the provisions of Chapter 13, article 8, to operate and maintain any garbage disposal plant, system or solid waste disposal areas located outside the corporate limits of the city or village. The garbage disposal plant, system or solid waste disposal areas shall be open to the public. The county board and the governing body of the city or village shall agree upon the operation and the appropriation of funds to such cooperative undertaking.

Laws 1967, c. 112, § 2, p. 360;

Laws 1969, c. 163, § 2, p. 738.